src-fst-affixes-propernouns.lexc.md
# Udmurt Proper noun inflection

Place names based on names of old tribes

These words typically end on -я, –га, –ка, –ра, –ла. When inflecting in some
cases, they take an infix which is optional.

The following may be exhaustive, but unsure yet.

* -я: Салья, Монья, Кибъя, Чабъя, Ӟумъя, Вамъя
* -га: Можга, Пурга, Дурга, Нылга, Эбга, Коньга
* -ка: Поска
* -ра: Бигра, Эгра
* -ла: Чола

Infix is optional in some cases

|   Case    |  Infix | No infix

| --- | --- | --- 
|  Iness.    |  Салья-ла-н   |  Салья-ын
|  Illat.     |  Салья-ла      |  Салья-е
|  Elat.      |  Салья-ла-сь   |  Салья-ысь
|  Egress.    |  Салья-ла-сен  |  Салья-ысен

The following cases do not have the infix at all

|   Case    |  No infix

| --- | --- 
|  Terminat.  |  Салья-озь
|  Prol.      |  Салья-тӥ
|  Appr.      |  Салья-лань


So far the PROP (underline) lexicon is a dummy pexicon that just gives **+N+Prop**,
and then redirects to *NOUNSUF_01*.


Words from lexicon **PROP_HEIMONNIMET** are "old" tribe and place names, 
which have an optional infix for some cases, while some do not.

In **HEIMO_SUFFIXES_LA**, we append the cases with their post-ла realizations.
Examples:
|   Case    |  Infix | No infix

| --- | --- | --- 
|  Iness.     |  Салья-ла-н    |  Салья-ын
|  Illat.     |  Салья-ла      |  Салья-е
|  Elat.      |  Салья-ла-сь   |  Салья-ысь
|  Egress.    |  Салья-ла-сен  |  Салья-ысен

Note also that the infix results in a 'short' case affix.

In **HEIMO_SUFFIXES_NIL**, the word gets cases with no infix.

|   Case  | wordform

| --- | --- 
|  Terminat.  |  Салья-озь
|  Prol.      |  Салья-тӥ
|  Appr.      |  Салья-лань



Russian type Surnames 

Preparing for the template urj-Cyrl
Beginning 2012-11-15





* :2 PropSur-kal ;  These are foreign Л words



Абдеев:Абдеев

Багрий:Багр


Аморский:Аморск








These are vowel-final stems
They have previously received +Sem/Fem tags








Should this be limited to +Sg? 2015-09-06

Вили:Вил




Андрей:Андре












Ending 2012-11-15









FEMALE NAMES FROM TEMPLATE



















* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-udm/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc)</small>
